Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-5] Hospital sustainability fee.
(a) Effective July 1, 2012, or, if later, the effective date of any necessary
federal approvals, the department shall charge and collect provider fees, to
be known as the hospital sustainability fee, on inpatient and outpatient care
services provided by private hospitals.

(b) The hospital sustainability fee shall be
based on the net patient service revenue for inpatient services and outpatient
services, respectively, of all hospitals that are subject to the hospital
sustainability fee.

(c) The hospital sustainability fee for
inpatient care services may differ from the fee for outpatient care services
but the fees shall not in the aggregate exceed three per cent of net patient
service revenue as derived from the hospital's medicare cost report ending
during state fiscal year 2013-2014. The inpatient hospital sustainability fee
shall not exceed three per cent of net inpatient hospital service revenue. The
outpatient hospital sustainability fee shall be three per cent of net
outpatient hospital service revenue. Each fee shall be the same percentage for
all affected hospitals, subject to subsection (d).

(d) The department shall exempt children's
hospitals, federal hospitals, public hospitals, and psychiatric hospitals from
the hospital sustainability fees on inpatient services. In addition, the
department shall exempt children's hospitals, public hospitals, rehabilitation
hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, and any hospitals with net outpatient
revenues of less than $57,000,000 per year based upon fiscal year 2013-2014
cost reports from the hospital sustainability fee on outpatient care services.

(e) The department, with agreement by the
hospital trade association located in Hawaii, may modify the structure of the
hospital sustainability program if such modification is necessary to obtain
federal waiver approval consistent with the requirements of 42 Code of Federal
Regulations section 433.68(e)(2).

(f) Notwithstanding section 346G-6, nothing
shall require the department to exempt a facility from the hospital
sustainability fee if it is not approved by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. [L 2012,
c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §§1(2),
2; am L 2015, c 70, §§1(3), 2; am L 2016, c 60, §2(3)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next